Maryland, session 2026, HB1088.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
8–415.
(A) The owner of real property may submit a petition for review as provided by §
14–503(a) of this article.
(B) A COUNTY OR A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY SUBMIT A PETITION FOR
REVIEW AS PROVIDED IN § 14–503(B) OF THIS ARTICLE.
14–503.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1088*

HOUSE BILL 1088
(a) A taxpayer may appeal the value or classification of the real property by
submitting a petition for review to the supervisor on or before the date of finality for the
next taxable year.
(b) (1) A COUNTY OR A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY SUBMIT A
PETITION FOR REVIEW TO THE SUPERVISOR ON OR BEFORE THE DATE OF FINALITY
FOR THE NEXT TAXABLE YEAR TO APPEAL THE VALUE OF COMMERCIAL REAL
PROPERTY:
(I) LOCATED IN THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION;
AND
(II) SOLD TO A NEW OWNER, IF THE TOTAL SALES PRICE OF THE
PROPERTY IS 20% OR MORE THAN THE TOTAL SALES PRICE WHEN THE PROPERTY
WAS PREVIOUSLY SOLD.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT PROCEDURES TO CARRY OUT
THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) If the requirements of subsection (a) OR (B) of this section are met, the
supervisor or the supervisor’s designee shall hold a hearing as provided under § 14–510 of
this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.